Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6749YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 2437 Section 1. Section 321.276, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) A deaf or hard-of-hearing person 3 using an electronic device to communicate in American sign 4 language if the person is at least twenty-five years old and 5 holds a driverâs license marked to reflect the personâs deaf or 6 hard-of-hearing status on the face of the license, including 7 as provided in section 321.189, subsection 9, or a similar 8 provision for the jurisdiction that issued the license. A 9 person using an electronic device pursuant to this subparagraph 10 shall not touch the device while driving the vehicle unless 11 the vehicle is at a complete stop. The electronic device must 12 remain fixed to the vehicle in a manner and location that does 13 not obstruct the personâs view or operation of the vehicle. 14